Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HEROES AND HERITAGE INTERPRETIVE TRAIL LOOP.new text end new text begin $318,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to the Dakota County Historical Society to design and build the Heroes and Heritage Interpretive Trail Loop along existing paved trails in South St. Paul, West St. Paul, and Inver Grove Heights. new text end